Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1061.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1731(d) of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1731. Accreditation.* * *(d) Office duties.--The Office of the Deputy Adjutant General for Veterans' Affairs shall establish a county director of veterans affairs training program, agreed upon with the State Association of County Directors of Veterans Affairs, which shall include the following:* * *(5) Training on a wide range of veteran-related topics, including trauma-informed care, military sexual trauma, post-123456789101112131415161718 traumatic stress disorder, traumatic brain injury and other forms of trauma-informed care.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250SB1061PN1274 - 2 - 123